Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6530
Full-time employee, defined.

Full-time employee means with respect to any month, an employee who is employed on average at least thirty hours of service per week.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 7.
July 1, 2027